Idaho statutes. Title 26 BANKS AND BANKING
Chapter 15
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec.

§ 26-1501. Office location.

Nothing in the laws of this state shall prohibit a bank from maintaining an authorized branch office, customer bank communication terminal or other authorized office at the same location as an authorized office of another bank or a savings and loan association, credit union or supervised lender authorized to do business under the Idaho uniform consumer credit code.

Nothing in the laws of this state shall prohibit a savings and loan association from maintaining an authorized branch office or other authorized office at the same location as an authorized office of another savings and loan association or a bank, credit union or supervised lender licensed to do business under the Idaho uniform consumer credit code.

Nothing in the laws of this state shall prohibit a credit union from maintaining an authorized branch office, customer credit union communication terminal or other authorized office at the same location as an authorized office of another credit union or a bank, savings and loan association or supervised lender licensed to do business under the Idaho uniform consumer credit code.

Nothing in the laws of this state shall prohibit a supervised lender authorized to do business under the Idaho uniform consumer credit code from maintaining an authorized branch office, or other authorized office, at the same location as an authorized office of another supervised lender or a bank, savings and loan association or credit union.

History.

I.C.,§ 26-1501, as added by 1979, ch. 224, § 1, p. 619.

§ 26-1502 — 26-1520. Bank collection code. [Repealed.]